California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(d) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of a majority or more of units converted to condominium interests to the existing lower income or very low income residents of that property, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property,
 other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Assisted housing development” means a multifamily rental housing development that receives federal government assistance, appearing of record and containing a legal description of the property, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of the Government Code.

(2) “Tenant association” means a group of tenants who have formed a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other entity or organization; or a local nonprofit, regional, or national organization whose purpose includes the acquisition of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium and which represents the interests of at least a majority of the tenants in the assisted housing development, real property, or
 condominium.

(3) “Nonprofit organization” means a not-for-profit corporation organized pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, which has as its principal purpose the ownership, development, or management of housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income, and which has a broadly representative board, a majority of whose members are community-based and has a proven track record of community service.

(4) “Public agency” means a housing authority, redevelopment agency, or any other agency of a city, county, or city and county, whether general law or chartered, which is authorized to own, develop, or manage housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(5) “Regional or national organization” means a not-for-profit, charitable corporation organized on a multicounty, state, or multistate basis which has as its principal purpose the ownership, development, or management of housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(6) “Regional or national agency” means a multicounty, state, or multistate agency which is authorized to own, develop, or manage housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(7) “Profit-motivated organization or individual” means an individual or two or more persons organized pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of, Division 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of Title 1 of, or Division 1 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 2 of, the Corporations Code, which
 carries on as a business for profit.

(8) “Lower income” means those residents having an income as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) “Very low income” means those residents having an income as defined by Section 50105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) “Resident” means a tenant or other person who lawfully occupies a unit located in a qualified low-income housing project as defined under Section 17058, and whose income qualifies as lower income or very low income.

(11) “Condominium” means the interest in real property defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code.

(f) If the purchase of residential real property results in the nonrecognition of gain on the sale of an
 assisted housing development, real property, or condominium under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), in determining the adjusted basis of the purchased residential real property as of any time following the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium, the adjustments to the basis shall include a reduction by an amount equal to the amount of the gain not so recognized on the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium. If more than one parcel of residential real property has been purchased, the nonrecognized gain from the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium shall be attributed to the parcels of residential real property on a pro rata basis based upon the purchase prices of those parcels.

(g) In accordance with subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), if the sale of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium results in a gain during the
 taxable year, then all of the following shall apply:

(1) The statutory period for the assessment of any deficiency attributable to any part of the gain shall not expire before the expiration of four years from the date the Franchise Tax Board is notified (on the form as the Franchise Tax Board may provide) of one of the following:

(A) The cost of purchasing the residential real property which satisfies the requirement of subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), and results in the nonrecognition of gain.

(B) The intention not to reinvest all of the proceeds from the sale in residential real property within the period specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(C) The failure to reinvest all of the proceeds from the sale in residential real property within
 the period specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d). 

(2) The deficiency may be assessed before the expiration of the period specified in paragraph (1), notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent the assessment.

(3) All information regarding the sale of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium, at a gain in accordance with subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), shall be disclosed in the return for the taxable year in which the sale took place in order to determine if the sale qualifies and the amount of nonrecognition of gain qualifies under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(h) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify that
 the lower income or very low income resident meets the definitions provided in paragraphs (8) and (9) of subdivision (e).

(2) Provide an annual listing to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon by the Franchise Tax Board and the Department of Housing and Community Development, of the names and identification numbers of the persons who are members of the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents that were issued a certification, and the names and identification numbers of the sellers of the property.

(3) Provide the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents a copy of the certification.

(i) The group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide the Department of Housing and Community Development with documents, as deemed necessary by the department, verifying the income of each member of the group.

(2) Provide a copy of the certification to the seller of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium.

(3) Retain a copy of the certification.

(j) The seller of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium shall do all of the following:

(1) Obtain a copy of the certification from the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium.

(2) Retain a copy of the group’s lower income or very
 low income certification for tax purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1436, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

18042.

(a) Section 1042 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sales of stock to employee stock ownership plans or certain cooperatives, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995. 

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2028, Section 1042 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sales of stock to employee stock ownership plans or certain cooperatives, is modified to provide that the term “domestic corporation” shall instead mean “domestic C corporation.” 

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2028, Section 1042(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of section to sale of stock in S corporation, shall apply. 

(d) Section 1042(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of section to sales of stock in agricultural refiners and processors to eligible farm cooperatives, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 60.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable from January 1, 1995, as prescribed by Sec. 106 of Stats. 1998, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

18045.

Section 1061 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to partnership interests held in connection with performance of services, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 61.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. General Rules for Determining Capital Gains and Losses [18151. - 18181.]

18151.

Subchapter P of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capital gains and losses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 29.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18151.5.

Section 301 of Title III of Division A of the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343), relating to gain or loss from sale of certain preferred stock, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 38.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18151.9.

The amendments made to Sections 1221(a)(3) and 1231(b)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 13314 of Public Law 115-97, relating to certain self-created property not treated as a capital asset, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 62.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18152.

Section 1202 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to 50-percent exclusion for gain from certain small business stock, does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 197.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18154.

Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this part, the natural gas transmission line explosion on September 9, 2010, in San Bruno, California, shall be treated as a federally declared disaster within the meaning of Section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 18, Sec. 3.   (AB 50)   Effective April 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18155.

A deduction shall not be allowed for capital loss carrybacks provided by Section 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capital loss carrybacks and carryovers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 18.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

18155.5.

Section 1223 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to holding period of property, is modified to additionally provide that in determining the period for which the taxpayer has held property the acquisition of which resulted under Section 18038.5 in the nonrecognition of any part of the gain realized on the sale of other property, there shall be included the period for which that other property has been held as of the date of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18155.6.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, specific reference to Sections 1223(4) to (16), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code in this part shall instead be treated as a reference to Sections 1223(3) to (15), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 39.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18165.

(a) Section 1245(a)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain deductions treated as amortization, is modified to also refer to Sections 17252.5, 17265, and 17266.

(b) Section 1245(b)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disposition of amortizable Section 197 intangibles, shall apply to dispositions of property on or
 after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 40.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18171.

Section 1250(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to additional depreciation, is modified as follows:

(a) “Depreciation adjustments,” as defined in Section 1250(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, do not include the following:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1983, amortization under Section 17251 or under Section 188 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) For taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 1983, amortization under former Section 17226, relating to pollution control facilities, or former Section 17227, relating to trademarks.

(b) “Additional depreciation,” as defined in Section 1250(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, includes the following:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1983, amortization under Section 167(k) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 1983, amortization under former Section 17211.7, relating to low-income rental housing, or former Section 17228.5, relating to certified historic structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18171.5.

Section 1250(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) The date “December 31, 1970” is substituted for “July 24, 1969,” and “December 31, 1969.”

(b) The date “January 1, 1971” is substituted for “January 1, 1970.”

(c) The date “December 31, 1976” is substituted for “December 31, 1975.”

(d) The date “January 1, 1977” is substituted for “January 1, 1976.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18177.

Section 1275(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the definition of tax-exempt obligations, does not apply but instead the term “tax-exempt obligation” means an obligation the interest on which is exempt from tax under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18178.

Section 1272 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified as follows:

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed, the amount included in gross income under this part shall be the same as the amount included in gross income on the federal tax return.

(b) The difference between the amount included in gross
 income on the federal return and the amount included in gross income under this part, with respect to obligations issued after December 31, 1984, for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, shall be included in gross income in the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed.

(c) Section 1004(b) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (P.L. 105-34), relating to the effective date for determination of original issue discount where pooled debt obligations are subject to acceleration, is modified to provide that the changes to Section 1272(a)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and the amount taken into account under Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be taken into account ratably over the four-taxable-year period beginning with the first taxable year beginning on or after January
 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 42.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18180.

(a) Section 7872 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of loans with below market interest rates, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7872(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exception for loans to qualified continuing care facilities, shall apply to calendar years beginning on or after January 1,
 2010, with respect to loans made before, on, or after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 41.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18181.

Part VI of Subchapter P of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain passive foreign investment companies, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 40.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.2. ADMINISTRATION OF FRANCHISE AND INCOME TAX LAWS [18401. - 19802.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [18401. - 18417.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Application [18401. - 18410.2.]

18401.

Each provision of this part shall apply to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), unless otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18402.

(a) Except where the context otherwise requires, the general provisions and definitions provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17001) of Part 10 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 23001) of Part 11 shall apply to this part.

(b) For purposes of this part, “person” includes an individual, fiduciary, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or organization exempt from taxation under Section 23701.

(c) (1) Whenever provisions of this part are applied in connection with Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), the terms “taxpayer,” “corporation” and “taxable year” have the same meaning as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17001) of Part 10.

(2) Whenever provisions of this part are applied in connection with Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), the terms “taxpayer,” “corporation,” “income year,” and “taxable year” have the same meaning as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23030) of Chapter 1 of Part 11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18403.

For purposes of this part, any return, declaration, report, statement, or other document required to be made or filed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be deemed to have been required to be made or filed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.

(a) In the case of a new statutory provision in Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 13201), Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or the addition of a new part, the Franchise Tax Board itself is authorized to grant relief as set forth in subdivision (b) from the requirements of the new statutory provision in a manner as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) The relief provided in
 subdivision (a) may be granted only for the first taxable year for which the new statutory provision is operative and only when substantial unintentional noncompliance with the new provision has occurred by a class of affected taxpayers. The relief is limited to waiving penalties or perfecting elections and may be granted only to taxpayers who timely paid taxes and other required amounts shown on the return consistent with the election and who timely filed their return (with regard to extension).

(c) The relief granted in this section shall, upon the recommendation of the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board, be made by resolution of the Franchise Tax Board that sets forth the conditions, time, and manner as the Franchise Tax Board determines are necessary. The resolution shall be adopted only by an affirmative vote of each of the three members of the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “New statutory provision” means a complete, newly established tax program, tax credit, exemption, deduction, exclusion, penalty, or reporting or payment requirement and does not mean amendments made to existing tax provisions that make minor modifications or technical changes.

(2) “Perfecting elections” includes correcting omissions or errors only when substantial evidence is present with the filed return that the taxpayer intended to make the election and does not include making an election where one was not previously attempted to be made.

(3) “Substantial unintentional noncompliance,” for purposes of Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), includes any case in which the taxpayer filed a water’s-edge contract with a timely filed original return and timely paid all
 taxes and other required amounts shown on the return consistent with the water’s-edge election, but where the taxpayer’s election is or might be invalidated by reason of the act or omission of an affiliated corporation that is not the parent or a subsidiary of the taxpayer. In that case, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, relief shall be deemed granted to validate the taxpayer’s water’s-edge election, conditioned only upon an agreement by the affiliated corporation to either (A) file a water’s-edge contract and pay all taxes and other required amounts consistent with that election, or (B) waive any right, with respect to any taxable year for which the corporation did not make a water’s-edge election on its own timely filed return, to determine its income derived from or attributable to sources within this state pursuant to that election, whichever measure produces the greater amount of tax.

(e) This section shall apply to
 any Franchise Tax Board resolution adopted after the effective date of this section with respect to any taxable year that is subject to an open statute of limitations on the date of the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18405, the Franchise Tax Board may, in its discretion, permit elections made under Section 25111 to be perfected during the period of limitations prescribed under Sections 19057 and 19306 for the applicable taxable year. The statute of limitations of all taxpayers in a water’s-edge group whose taxable year falls, in whole or in part, within the period of the election shall remain open to receive adjustments, under claim or deficiency, consistent with that perfection of the election.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the 1988 taxable year of any taxpayer whose water’s-edge election has been perfected pursuant to Section 18405.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 633, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18406.

For the purposes of this part, except as otherwise provided, the determination of whether an individual is an employee shall be governed by Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2775) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 4.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18407.

Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general requirement of return, statement, or list, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 6011(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general rule, is modified as follows:

(1) The phrase “any person liable for any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11
 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part,” shall be substituted for the phrase “when required by regulations prescribed by the Secretary any person made liable for any tax imposed by this title,” contained therein.

(2) “Secretary of the Treasury under Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes or by the Franchise Tax Board” shall be substituted for “Secretary.”

(3) To additionally provide that “reportable transaction” includes any transaction of a type that the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes or the Franchise Tax Board under this section for California income or franchise tax purposes determines as having a potential for tax avoidance or evasion including deductions, basis, credits, entity classification, dividend elimination, or omission of income, and shall be reported
 on the return or the statement required to be made.

(4) To additionally provide that “listed transaction” includes any transaction that is the same as, or substantially similar to, a transaction specifically identified by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes or by the Franchise Tax Board under this section for California income or franchise tax purposes, as a tax avoidance transaction including deductions, basis, credits, entity classification, dividend elimination, or omission of income and shall be reported on the return or statement required to be made.

(A) The Franchise Tax Board shall identify and publish “listed transactions” (whether identified by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 6011 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes or by the Franchise Tax Board) through the use
 of Franchise Tax Board Notices or other published positions. In addition, the “listed transactions” identified and published pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be published on the Web site of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall conduct a public outreach program to make taxpayers aware of the new and increased penalties associated with the use of tax avoidance transactions including deductions, basis, credits, entity classification, dividend elimination, or omission of income.

(5) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraph (4).

(b) Section 6011(b) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, relating to identification of taxpayer, does not apply and, in lieu thereof, Section 18408 shall apply.

(c) Section 6011(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to returns, etc., of DISCs and former DISCs and FSCs and former FSCs, does not apply.

(d) Section 6011(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to authority to require information concerning Section 912 allowances, does not apply.

(e) Section 6011(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulations requiring returns on magnetic media, etc., shall take into account Section 18408 and shall also include the modifications made to Section 6011(e) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 18408.

(f) Section 6011(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to incentives, does not
 apply.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 327.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18408.

The Franchise Tax Board is authorized to require that information with respect to persons subject to the taxes imposed by Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 (relating to tax withheld at source) as is necessary or helpful in securing proper identification of those persons.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18552 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 863, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18409.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe regulations providing standards for determining which returns shall be filed on magnetic media or in other machine-readable form. The Franchise Tax Board may not require returns of any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) on estates and trusts to be other than on paper forms supplied by the Franchise Tax Board. In prescribing those regulations, the Franchise Tax Board shall take into account, among other relevant factors, the ability of the taxpayer to comply at a reasonable cost with that filing requirement.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) is applicable only to taxpayers required to file returns on
 magnetic media or in other machine-readable form pursuant to Section 6011(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulations requiring returns on magnetic media, and the regulations adopted thereto. 

(2) In addition, the regulations under subdivision (a) shall not require that returns filed on magnetic media or in other machine-readable form contain more information than is required to be included in similar returns filed with the Internal Revenue Service under Section 6011(e) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations adopted thereto.

(c) In lieu of the magnetic media or other machine-readable form returns required by this section, a copy of the similar magnetic media or other machine-readable form returns filed with the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to
 Section 6011(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, and the regulations adopted thereto, may be filed with the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 63.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.

For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and this part, a legal holiday includes a federal legal holiday recognized by the Internal Revenue Service under Section 7503 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   (AB 318)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.2.

(a) The California Competes Tax Credit Committee is hereby established. The committee shall consist of the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, who shall serve as chair of the committee, or their designated representatives, and one appointee each by the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules. A Member of the Legislature shall not be appointed.

(b) For purposes of Article 4.4 (commencing with Section 12096.6) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Sections 17059.2 and 23689, the California Competes Tax Credit Committee shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Approve or reject any written agreement for a tax credit or grant allocation by resolution at a duly noticed public meeting held in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), but only after receipt of the fully executed written agreement between the taxpayer and the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(2) Approve or reject any recommendation to recapture, in whole or in part, a tax credit or grant allocation by resolution at a duly noticed public meeting held in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code),
 but only after receipt of the recommendation from the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development pursuant to the terms of the fully executed written agreement.

(c) For purposes of Article 4.4 (commencing with Section 12096.6) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Sections 17059.2 and 23689, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall provide a member of the committee, or their designated representatives, listed in subdivision (a), upon request of that member, with any information necessary to fulfill their duties or otherwise comply with the requirements of this section. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to provide information to the member or their designated representative that the
 applicant considers to be a trade secret, confidential, privileged, or otherwise exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 146.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Continuity with Prior Law [18412. - 18417.]

18412.

The provisions of this part insofar as they are substantially the same as statutory provisions relating to the same subject matter in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), as those provisions, including applicable regulations, existed on December 31, 1993, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18413.

The repeal of any provision in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) made by the act adding this section shall not affect any act done or any right accruing or accrued, or any suit, appeal, or other proceeding having commenced under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), before that repeal; but all rights and liabilities under that law shall continue, and may be enforced in the same manner, as if that repeal had not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18414.

Any provision of this part that refers to the application of any portion of this part to a prior period (or which depends upon the application to a prior period of any portion of this part) shall, when appropriate and consistent with the purpose of that provision, be deemed to refer to (or depend upon the application of) the corresponding provision of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) as was applicable to the prior period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.

Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, the provisions of any act:

(a) That affect the imposition or computation of taxes, additions to tax other than Sections 19136 or 19142, penalties, or the allowance of credits against the tax, shall be applied to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year in which the act takes effect.

(b) That change the provisions of Sections 19023 to 19027, inclusive, (relating to
 payment of estimated tax) or Section 19136 or Sections 19142 to 19151, inclusive, (relating to underpayment of estimated tax) shall be applied to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year immediately after the year in which the act takes effect.

(c) That otherwise affect the provisions of this part shall be applied on and after the date the act takes effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18416.

(a) Unless expressly otherwise provided in this part, any notice may be given by first-class mail postage prepaid.

(b) For purposes of this part, any notice mailed to a taxpayer shall be sufficient if mailed to the taxpayer’s last known address.

(c) The last known address shall be the address that appears on the taxpayer’s last return filed with the Franchise Tax Board, unless the taxpayer has provided to the
 Franchise Tax Board clear and concise written or electronic notification of a different address, or the Franchise Tax Board has an address it has reason to believe is the most current address for the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 341, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18416.5.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may, by regulation, implement an alternative communication method that would allow the Franchise Tax Board, at the request of the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative, to provide notification to the taxpayer in a preferred electronic communication method designated by the taxpayer that a notice, statement, bill, or other communication required or authorized under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) is available for viewing in the taxpayer’s limited access secure folder on the Franchise Tax Board’s internet website and
 would allow the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative to file a protest, notification, and other communication to the Franchise Tax Board in a secure manner. Prior to obtaining the consent of a taxpayer to participate in the alternative communication method authorized by this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall advise the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative of the ramifications of electing to receive notifications from the Franchise Tax Board in the manner selected and of failing to take appropriate action in response to one or more of those notifications.

(b) Sending electronic notification to a taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative pursuant to the taxpayer’s request made in accordance with regulations authorized under subdivision (a) shall not be considered a violation of Section 19542 or 19542.1. Any electronic notification provided to a taxpayer using the alternative communication method
 authorized by this section shall include plain language advising the taxpayer that a failure to act may cause the taxpayer to forego procedural or administrative rights to challenge the proposed action.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law regarding the use of United States mail, any notice, statement, bill, protest, and other communication from the Franchise Tax Board to a taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative and from a taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to the alternative communication method authorized by this section shall be treated as if it were mailed by United States mail, postage prepaid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   (AB 3287)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18417.

Provisions in other codes or general law statutes that are related to this part include all of the following:

(a) Chapter 20.6 (commencing with Section 9891) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, relating to tax preparers.

(b) Sections 1502, 2204 to 2206, inclusive, 6210, 6810, 8210, and 8810 of the Corporations Code, relating to the corporation officer statement penalty.
